Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.400

Pedestrian.

"Pedestrian" means any person who is afoot or who is using a wheelchair, a power wheelchair, or a means of conveyance propelled by human power other than a bicycle.

[ 2003 c 141 s 5; 1990 c 241 s 1; 1961 c 12 s 46.04.400. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 41; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]